Maryland, session 2026, HB0921.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Correctional Services
9–614.3.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “DEPARTMENT” MEANS THE DEPARTMENT OF JUVENILE
SERVICES.
(3) “RESTRICTIVE HOUSING” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–614
OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO A FACILITY OPERATED BY THE
DEPARTMENT.
(C) A MINOR MAY NOT BE PLACED IN RESTRICTIVE HOUSING SOLELY FOR
THE PURPOSES OF DISCIPLINE, PUNISHMENT, ADMINISTRATIVE CONVENIENCE,
RETALIATION, OR STAFFING SHORTAGES.
(D) (1) A MINOR MAY BE PLACED IN RESTRICTIVE HOUSING AS A
TEMPORARY MEASURE IF:
(I) THE MANAGING OFFICIAL OF THE FACILITY FINDS BY CLEAR
AND CONVINCING EVIDENCE THAT THERE IS AN IMMEDIATE AND SUBSTANTIAL
RISK:
1. OF PHYSICAL HARM TO THE MINOR, OTHER
INCARCERATED INDIVIDUALS, OR STAFF; OR
2. TO THE SECURITY OF THE FACILITY;
(II) THERE ARE NO OTHER REASONABLE MEANS TO ELIMINATE
THE RISK;
(III) RESTRICTIVE HOUSING IS USED ONLY TO THE EXTENT
NECESSARY TO ELIMINATE THE IDENTIFIED RISK;
(IV) RESTRICTIVE HOUSING OCCURS UNDER THE LEAST
RESTRICTIVE CONDITIONS PRACTICABLE AND CONSISTENT WITH THE RATIONALE
FOR THE MINOR’S PLACEMENT IN RESTRICTIVE HOUSING;

HOUSE BILL 921 3
(V) FACILITY STAFF PROMPTLY NOTIFIES THE MINOR OF THE
RATIONALE FOR THE MINOR’S PLACEMENT IN RESTRICTIVE HOUSING; AND
(VI) FACILITY STAFF DEVELOPS A PLAN THAT WILL ALLOW THE
MINOR TO LEAVE RESTRICTIVE HOUSING AND RETURN TO THE GENERAL
POPULATION AS SOON AS POSSIBLE.
(2) (I) A HEALTH CARE OR MENTAL HEALTH CARE PROVIDER
SHALL CONDUCT A MENTAL HEALTH SCREENING OF A MINOR PLACED IN
RESTRICTIVE HOUSING UNDER THIS SUBSECTION WITHIN 1 HOUR OF THE MINOR’S
PLACEMENT.
(II) FOLLOWING THE MENTAL HEALTH SCREENING CONDUCTED
UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL
PROVIDE THE MINOR WITH ANY NECESSARY MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES.
(3) A MINOR PLACED IN RESTRICTIVE HOUSING UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL BE HOUSED IN RESTRICTIVE HOUSING FOR THE SHORTEST
AMOUNT OF TIME NECESSARY, NOT TO EXCEED 6 HOURS.
(4) AT THE END OF THE TIME PERIOD DESCRIBED UNDER
PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(I) RETURN THE MINOR TO THE GENERAL POPULATION;
(II) TRANSPORT THE MINOR TO AN EMERGENCY DEPARTMENT;
(III) TRANSFER THE MINOR TO THE MEDICAL UNIT IN THE
FACILITY; OR
(IV) PROVIDE SPECIAL INDIVIDUALIZED PROGRAMMING
OUTSIDE OF RESTRICTIVE HOUSING THAT MAY INCLUDE:
1. IN–PERSON SUPERVISION BY AND INTERACTION WITH
STAFF MEMBERS;
2. IN–PERSON PROVISION OF EDUCATIONAL SERVICES;
3. INVOLVEMENT OF THE MINOR IN OTHER ASPECTS OF
THE FACILITY’S PROGRAMMING, UNLESS THE INVOLVEMENT THREATENS THE
SAFETY OF THE MINOR OR STAFF OR THE SECURITY OF THE FACILITY;

HOUSE BILL 921
4. DEVELOPMENT OF AN INDIVIDUALIZED PLAN TO
IMPROVE THE MINOR’S BEHAVIOR, CREATED IN CONSULTATION WITH THE MINOR,
MENTAL HEALTH CARE OR HEALTH CARE STAFF, AND THE MINOR’S FAMILY
MEMBERS, THAT IDENTIFIES THE CAUSES AND PURPOSES OF THE NEGATIVE
BEHAVIOR AND ESTABLISHES CONCRETE GOALS THAT THE MINOR CAN WORK
TOWARD IN ORDER TO BE REMOVED FROM SPECIAL PROGRAMMING; AND
5. DAILY REVIEW WITH THE MINOR OF THE MINOR’S
PROGRESS TOWARD GOALS OUTLINED IN THE INDIVIDUALIZED PLAN.
(E) (1) A MINOR MAY BE PLACED IN RESTRICTIVE HOUSING AT THE
MINOR’S REQUEST.
(2) A MINOR PLACED IN RESTRICTIVE HOUSING UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION MAY REVOKE A REQUEST TO BE PLACED IN RESTRICTIVE HOUSING AT
ANY TIME, AND, IF REVOKED, THE MINOR SHALL BE IMMEDIATELY RETURNED TO
THE GENERAL POPULATION.
(F) A MINOR PLACED IN RESTRICTIVE HOUSING SHALL BE PROVIDED:
(1) THE SAME STANDARD OF ACCESS TO THE FOLLOWING PRIVILEGES
AND CONDITIONS THAT ARE PROVIDED TO INCARCERATED INDIVIDUALS NOT IN
RESTRICTIVE HOUSING:
(I) PHONE CALLS;
(II) VISITS;
(III) MAIL;
(IV) FOOD;
(V) WATER;
(VI) SHOWERS;
(VII) SANITARY SUPPLIES;
(VIII) PROPERTY, INCLUDING CLOTHING AND BEDDING;
(IX) EDUCATIONAL SERVICES;
(X) EDUCATIONAL READING MATERIALS; AND

HOUSE BILL 921 5
(XI) MEDICAL, MENTAL, AND DENTAL HEALTH CARE; AND
(2) UNLESS IT WOULD POSE A RISK OF PHYSICAL HARM TO THE MINOR
OR ANOTHER, MAXIMIZED ACCESS TO RECREATION, EDUCATION, AND
PROGRAMMING.
(G) IF A PRIVILEGE OR CONDITION DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (F) OF THIS
SECTION IS NOT PROVIDED TO THE MINOR, THE MANAGING OFFICIAL OR THE
MANAGING OFFICIAL’S DESIGNEE SHALL RECORD THE REASON IN THE MINOR’S
FILE.
Article – Human Services
9–227.
(b) The Department shall:
(2) adopt regulations applicable to residential facilities it operates that:
(i) prohibit the use of locked door seclusion and restraints as
punishment [and describe the circumstances under which locked door seclusion and
restraints may be used], FOR CONVENIENCE, AS A STAFFING SUBSTITUTE, OR IN
RETALIATION;
(II) SPECIFY THAT LOCKED DOOR SECLUSION AND RESTRAINTS
MAY BE USED ONLY WHEN ALL LESS RESTRICTIVE MEASURES HAVE BEEN
EXHAUSTED;
(III) LIMIT THE USE OF LOCKED DOOR SECLUSION AND
RESTRAINTS TO THOSE INSTANCES WHERE THERE IS AN IMMEDIATE AND
SUBSTANTIAL RISK OF PHYSICAL HARM TO THE CHILD OR OTHERS, OR IMMINENT
RISK OF ESCAPE;
(IV) REQUIRE THAT THE USE OF ANY LOCKED DOOR SECLUSION:
1. BE TRAUMA–INFORMED, DEVELOPMENTALLY
APPROPRIATE, AND TIME–LIMITED;
2. REQUIRE VISUAL INSPECTION OF THE CHILD BY
DIRECT CARE STAFF IN INTERVALS OF LESS THAN 15 MINUTES;
3. REQUIRE AN INITIAL MEDICAL AND BEHAVIORAL
HEALTH ASSESSMENT OF THE CHILD TO BE CONDUCTED NOT LATER THAN 30
MINUTES AFTER THE INITIATION OF THE LOCKED DOOR SECLUSION;

HOUSE BILL 921
4. REQUIRE REPEATED MEDICAL AND BEHAVIORAL
HEALTH ASSESSMENTS AT REGULAR INTERVALS FOLLOWING AN INITIAL MEDICAL
EXAMINATION UNDER ITEM 3 OF THIS ITEM;
5. PROVIDE SCHEDULED MEALS AND SNACKS, ACCESS
TO WATER, BATHROOM ACCESS, ACCESS TO EDUCATIONAL SERVICES AND
MATERIALS, AND ACCESS TO HYGIENE ITEMS;
6. BE TERMINATED IMMEDIATELY ONCE THE
IMMEDIATE AND SUBSTANTIAL THREAT HAS PASSED; AND
7. BE FOLLOWED BY A DEBRIEFING WITH A BEHAVIORAL
HEALTH REVIEW TO PREVENT FUTURE USE FOR THE CHILD; and
[(ii)] (V) prohibit abuse of a child; and
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.